District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.152

Contingency cash reserve notification.

Within 3 business days after an allocation from or use of the contingency cash reserve fund established by § 1-204.50a, the Chief Financial Officer shall transmit to the Budget Director of the Council a report of the:

(1)

Amount of the allocation or use; and

(2)

Purpose of the allocation or use.

History

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7232, 60 DCR 12472

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7232 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7232 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 7231 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle W of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Contingency Cash Reserve Notification Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.